Massachusetts, session 194th, H4584.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 1 of Chapter 31 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, including the provisions of Chapter 17 of the Acts of 2018,
the maximum age of eligibility for a retired Malden Police Officer to be appointed to the position
of Special Police Officers in the City of Malden shall be seventy (70) years of age.
SECTION 2. All other provisions of Chapter 17 of the Acts of 2018 shall remain in full
force and effect.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 1